Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2435
Leased property; termination of lease; notice.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if leased property contains a clandestine drug lab, an owner may terminate the lease agreement upon three days' written notice for the purpose of rehabilitating the contaminated property in accordance with the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to section 71-2434.

Laws 2006, LB 915, § 4.